src/fst/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
!! # quantifier affixes

LEXICON NUM_KAKS1
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom:ks' K ;
+Sg+Gen:hten K ;

LEXICON NUM_YKS1
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom:ks' K ;
+Sg+Gen:hten K ;


LEXICON NUM_NORUZ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom:%>D1E1 K ;
: N_NORUZ ; ! this applies correct case

LEXICON NUM_
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+Sg+Nom: K ;
!+Der/MWN: # ;
